Montana, session 2025, HB733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibition of certain federal firearms laws. A federal law, rule,
executive order, or regulation pertaining to firearms enacted after November 9, 1889, that is more restrictive
than Montana laws pertaining to firearms may not be enforced by a peace officer, state employee, or employee
of a political subdivision.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 45, chapter 8, part 3, and the provisions of Title 45, chapter 8, part 3, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Retroactive applicability. [This act] applies retroactively, within the
meaning of 1-2-109, to a federal law, executive order, rule, or regulation adopted or enacted on or after
November 8, 1889, or a new and more restrictive interpretation of a law that existed on November 8, 1889.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 733